Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.120

Injunction.

If, in the opinion of the director, a person violates or there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, the director may bring an action in the appropriate court to enjoin the violation or to enforce compliance. Upon a proper showing, a restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, shall be granted, and a receiver or a conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

[ 1994 c 92 s 271; 1989 c 212 s 12.]